Hawaii, session 2026, SB3252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State faces billions of dollars in current and future losses and financial liabilities resulting from the impacts of climate change. The legislature further finds that the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission (commission) was created to "provide policy direction, facilitation, coordination, and planning..." and "establish climate change mitigation and adaptation strategies and goals to help guide planning and implementation..."  Those strategies and goals were to be used by the office of planning and sustainable development to develop the next steps for planning and implementation, and state departments were then to take action. However, the legislature further finds that the co-chairs responsible for the commission agenda and resulting work may have inherent conflicts of interest that have prevented the commission from fulfilling the vast majority of its statutorily mandated duties, resulting in missed opportunities to reduce climate-related impacts and costs for Hawaii residents. The legislature notes that the tasks assigned by statute to the commission were, in relevant part, to "identify existing climate change mitigation and adaptation efforts at the federal, state, and local levels and make recommendations for how to meet or exceed Hawaii's state mitigation goals[,]" to "adopt a liberal approach in preparation, so as to minimize future risk to the people and environment of Hawaii[,]" to "assess the capacity and availability of existing resources and identify new sources of revenue necessary to address climate change mitigation and adaptation and [to] advise the governor, legislature, and counties on the economic and budgetary ramifications of climate change impacts, mitigation, and adaptation[,]" and to "identify the information necessary to track progress in implementing climate change mitigation and adaptation efforts and [to] conduct a comprehensive review of the implementation as required by this section[.]" The legislature additionally finds that, while the state climate commission coordinator has done remarkable work with minimal resources under the commission's direction, the broader commission agenda, as set by the co‑chairs, has yet to consider, evaluate, or deliver meaningful recommendations, policies, and progress evaluations as required by statute. The legislature also finds that reforming the commission's structure can eliminate the potential conflicts of interest that have prevented the commission from performing its duties as required by law.  Currently, the co-chairs of the commission, the director of the office of planning and sustainable development and the chairperson of the board of land and natural resources, appear to be conflicted, as they are tasked with evaluating fellow departments on progress, which can naturally lead to conflicts within the executive branch.  The co‑chairs are also tasked with making recommendations to fellow departments and the legislature, which can conflict with the policy and budget priorities set by the administration. The legislature believes these structural conflicts must be resolved.  Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Amend the leadership, membership, powers, and duties of the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission; (2)  Establish the powers and duties of the climate change mitigation and adaptation commission coordinator; (3)  Beginning after December 31, 2026, require all department and agency plans and decisions to consider recommendations made by the commission and coordinator; and (4)  Appropriate funds for positions and other expenses. SECTION 2.  Section 225P-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted and to read as follows: ""Coordinator" means the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation coordinator." SECTION 3.  Section 225P-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§225P-3  Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission; general functions, duties, and powers.  (a) There is established the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission that shall be placed within the department of land and natural resources for administrative purposes only. (b) Coordination of the commission shall be headed [jointly by the chairperson of the board of land and natural resources, or the chairperson's designee, and the director of the office of planning and sustainable development, or the director's designee.] by the coordinator. (c)  The commission shall include the following members: (1)  The coordinator, who shall serve as the chairperson of the commission; [(1)] (2)  The chairs of the standing committees of the legislature with subject matter jurisdiction encompassing environmental protection and land use; [(2)] (3) The chairperson of the board of land and natural resources or the chairperson's designee[, who shall be the co-chair of the commission]; [(3)] (4) The director of the office of planning and sustainable development or the director's designee[, who shall be the co-chair of the commission]; [(4)] (5) The director of business, economic development, and tourism or the director's designee; [(5)] (6) The chairperson of the board of directors of the Hawaii tourism authority or the chairperson's designee; [(6)] (7) The chairperson of the board of agriculture and biosecurity or the chairperson's designee; [(7)] (8) The chief executive officer of the office of Hawaiian affairs or the officer's designee; [(8)] (9) The chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission or the chairperson's designee; [(9)] (10) The director of transportation or the director's designee; [(10)] (11) The director of health or the director's designee; [(11)  The adjutant general or the adjutant general's designee;] (12)  The administrator of the Hawaii emergency management agency or the administrator's designee; [(12)] (13) The chairperson of the board of education or the chairperson's designee; [(13)] (14) The directors of each of the county planning departments[,] or the directors' designees; and [(14)  The manager of the coastal zone management program.] (15)  The comptroller or the comptroller's designee. (d)  In addition to the members listed in subsection (c), the [chairs of the commission] coordinator may request the participation or input of members of the public; experts in the field; and county, state, or federal officials or others as necessary. (e)  The members of the commission shall serve without pay but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in carrying out their duties. [(f)  The commission shall provide policy direction, facilitation, coordination, and planning among state and county agencies, federal agencies, and other partners as appropriate. (g)  The commission shall establish climate change mitigation and adaptation strategies and goals to help guide planning and implementation statewide using the latest scientific analysis and risk assessment to monitor and forecast climate change related impacts at the regional, state, and local level, including any additional information deemed necessary. (h)  The commission shall identify vulnerable people, communities, industries, ecosystems, and the potential economic ramifications for climate change related impacts. (i)  The commission shall identify existing climate change mitigation and adaptation efforts at the federal, state, and local levels and make recommendations for how to meet or exceed Hawaii's state mitigation goals and shall adopt a liberal approach in preparation, so as to minimize future risk to the people and environment of Hawaii. (j)  The commission shall assess the capacity and availability of existing resources and identify new sources of revenue necessary to address climate change mitigation and adaptation and shall advise the governor, legislature, and counties on the economic and budgetary ramifications of climate change impacts, mitigation, and adaptation. (k)  The commission shall identify the information necessary to track progress in implementing climate change mitigation and adaptation efforts and shall submit an annual report to the governor and legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session of the legislature. (l)  The commission shall maintain a website that includes a mission statement as well as access to climate change related actions, plans, policies, and results. (m)  The commission shall conduct a comprehensive review of the implementation as required by this section and submit a report to the governor, legislature, and the counties no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2023 and every five years thereafter. (n)  The commission shall, as a first step, focus on and develop sea level rise vulnerability and adaptation reports that shall include: (1)  Identification of the major areas of sea level rise impacts affecting the State and counties through 2050; (2)  Identification of expected impacts of sea level rise based on the latest scientific research for each area through 2050; (3)  Identification of the economic ramifications of sea level rise; (4)  Identification of applicable federal laws, policies, or programs that impact affected areas; and (5)  Recommendations for planning, management, and adaptation for hazards associated with increasing sea level rise. The reports shall be made publicly available no later than December 31, 2017, and the commission shall reevaluate and update the sea level rise vulnerability and adaptation report every five years. (o)  In developing the report, pursuant to subsection (n), the commission shall: (1)  Solicit public views and concerns; and (2)  Coordinate with the various county, state, and federal agencies involved in ongoing climate change adaptation planning initiatives.] (f)  Each state department having an officer or employee as a member of the commission shall submit to the commission a report containing the department's plans and proposed courses of action to meet or exceed the State's climate mitigation and adaptation directives and targets.  The coordinator shall assist the departments in complying with this subsection and shall make the reports publicly available. (g)  The commission may enter into contracts for the procurement of goods and services to advance climate change mitigation and adaptation. (h)  The coordinator may hire staff necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, including specialist positions exempt from chapter 76. (i)  The coordinator shall: (1)  Provide policy direction, facilitation, coordination, and planning among state and county agencies, federal agencies, and other partners as appropriate; (2)  Establish climate change mitigation and adaptation strategies and goals to help guide statewide planning and implementation using the latest scientific analyses and risk assessments to monitor and forecast climate change-related impacts at the state and county levels; (3)  Identify vulnerable people, communities, industries, and ecosystems and the potential short- and long-term ramifications of climate-related impacts for public health, economics, and the environment, based on the latest and best international models; (4)  Identify existing climate change mitigation and adaptation efforts in other jurisdictions and make recommendations for how to implement similar efforts in the State to meet or exceed the State's climate change mitigation and adaptation goals.  In establishing the recommendations, the coordinator shall adopt an approach that minimizes future risk to the people and environment of the State; (5)  Assess the capacity and availability of existing resources; identify any new sources of revenue necessary to address climate change mitigation and adaptation; and advise the governor, legislature, and counties on the economic and budgetary ramifications of climate change impacts, mitigation, and adaptation, including current or future costs for both the government and residents that may be avoided or reduced through mitigation or adaptation strategies, based on the latest and best international models; (6)  Evaluate the State's progress toward reaching climate mitigation and adaptation directives and targets, including identifying the information necessary to track progress in implementing climate change mitigation and adaptation efforts; (7)  Maintain a website that includes a mission statement as well as access to climate change-related actions, plans, policies, and results; (8)  Contract for services if required for the implementation of this chapter; and (9)  Conduct a comprehensive review of the efforts required by this section and submit a report to the governor, legislature, and counties no later than twenty days prior to each regular session that includes: (A)  Updated information related to paragraphs (1) through (6), including expected climate impacts on the public health, environment, and economy of the State based on the latest science; any current or future costs for both the government and residents that may be avoided or reduced through the latest mitigation or adaptation strategies; and the overall progress toward the State's climate mitigation and adaptation directives and targets, as established by law; and (B)  For each state department having an officer or employee as a member of the commission and the department's respective jurisdiction: (i)  An update on the top three states, excluding the State, demonstrating the most progress on climate mitigation and adaptation related to the jurisdiction of that department, including an overview of that state's contributing policies, programs, projects, and best practices; (ii)  No fewer than five other examples of the most innovative and successful government projects, programs, policies, and best practices relevant to the jurisdiction of that department that have been developed or implemented by other countries, states, cities, or jurisdictions and that may help accelerate the department's success in meeting the climate mitigation and adaptation directives and targets established by law; (iii)  The department's current plans and efforts to meet the climate mitigation and adaptation directives and targets established by law; and (iv)  Recommendations for improving the department's current plans and proposed courses of action to better meet and exceed the State's climate-related targets. (j)  After December 31, 2026, all department and agency plans and decisions shall consider the recommendations made pursuant to this chapter." SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for: (1)  The establishment of the following positions within the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission: (A)  Four full-time equivalent (4.0 FTE) specialist positions, exempt from chapter 76, Hawaii Revised Statutes; (B)  One full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) account clerk V; and (C)  One full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) office manager; and (2)  Other expenses, including contracts entered into under chapter 225P, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.